lexc/verb/enhuige5ik.lexc
LEXICON Caseforr
+PastIndefSg1:^+cPIndefSg1^§igeou§tt§AA§m            #;    ! tem/tam
+PastIndefSg2:^+cPIndefSg2^§igeou§tt§igeaa§l         #;    ! tál/tél
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§igeou§tt      #;    ! t
+PastIndefPl1:^+cPIndefPl1^§igeou§tt§igeu§nk         #;    ! tünk/tunk
+PastIndefPl2:^+cPIndefPl2^§igeou§tt§igea§t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tetek/tatok
+PastIndefPl3:^+cPIndefPl3^§igeou§tt§igea§k          #;    ! tek/tak
+PastDefSg1:^+cPDefSg1^§igeou§tt§igea§m              #;    ! tem/tam
+PastDefSg2:^+cPDefSg2^§igeou§tt§igea§d              #;    ! tad/ted
+PastDefSg3:^+cPDefSg3^§igeou§tt§igea§               #;    ! ta/te
+PastDefPl1:^+cPDefPl1^§igeou§tt§igeu§k              #;    ! tuk/tük
+PastDefPl2:^+cPDefPl2^§igeou§tt§igeaa§t§igeo2§k     #;    ! tátok/tétek
+PastDefPl3:^+cPDefPl3^§igeou§tt§igeaa§k             #;    ! ták/ték
+CondIndefSg1:^+cCIndefSg1^§igea§nék               #;    ! nék
+CondIndefSg2:^+cCIndefSg2^§igea§n§igeaa§l         #;    ! nál/nél
+CondIndefSg3:^+cCIndefSg3^§igea§n§igea§           #;    ! na/ne
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^§igea§n§igeaa§nk            #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^§igea§n§igeoo§k #;
+CondIndefPl2:^+cCIndefPl2^§igea§n§igeaa§t§igeo§k      #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondIndefPl3:^+cCIndefPl3^§igea§n§igeaa§n§igea§k      #;    ! nának/nének
+CondDefSg1:^+cCDefSg1^§igea§n§igeaa§m                 #;    ! nám/ném
+CondDefSg2:^+cCDefSg2^§igea§n§igeaa§d                 #;    ! nád/néd
+CondDefSg3:^+cCDefSg3^§igea§n§igeaa§                  #;    ! ná/né
+CondDefPl1:^+cCDefPl1^§igea§n§igeaa§nk                #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondDefPl2:^+cCDefPl2^§igea§n§igeaa§t§igeo§k          #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondDefPl3:^+cCDefPl3^§igea§n§igeaa§k                 #;    ! nák/nék
+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^§igeou§tt§igea§l§igea§k               #;    ! ta/te
+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^§igea§n§igeaa§l§igea§k                  #;    ! ná/né
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^§igea§n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^§igea§n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^§igea§ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^§igea§n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^§igea§n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§igea§ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§igea§ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^§igea§ni  #;


LEXICON AddVerbzull
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0 Casezull;

LEXICON Casezull
+PastIndefSg1:^+cPIndefSg1^t§AA§m            #;    ! tem/tam
+PastIndefSg2:^+cPIndefSg2^t§igeaa§l         #;    ! tál/tél
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^t      #;    ! t
+PastIndefPl1:^+cPIndefPl1^t§igeu§nk         #;    ! tünk/tunk
+PastIndefPl2:^+cPIndefPl2^t§igea§t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tetek/tatok
+PastIndefPl3:^+cPIndefPl3^t§igea§k          #;    ! tek/tak
+PastDefSg1:^+cPDefSg1^t§igea§m              #;    ! tem/tam
+PastDefSg2:^+cPDefSg2^t§igea§d              #;    ! tad/ted
+PastDefSg3:^+cPDefSg3^t§igea§               #;    ! ta/te
+PastDefPl1:^+cPDefPl1^t§igeu§k              #;    ! tuk/tük
+PastDefPl2:^+cPDefPl2^t§igeaa§t§igeo2§k     #;    ! tátok/tétek
+PastDefPl3:^+cPDefPl3^t§igeaa§k             #;    ! ták/ték
+CondIndefSg1:^+cCIndefSg1^nék               #;    ! nék
+CondIndefSg2:^+cCIndefSg2^n§igeaa§l         #;    ! nál/nél
+CondIndefSg3:^+cCIndefSg3^n§igea§           #;    ! na/ne
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeaa§nk            #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeoo§k #;
+CondIndefPl2:^+cCIndefPl2^n§igeaa§t§igeo§k      #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondIndefPl3:^+cCIndefPl3^n§igeaa§n§igea§k      #;    ! nának/nének
+CondDefSg1:^+cCDefSg1^n§igeaa§m                 #;    ! nám/ném
+CondDefSg2:^+cCDefSg2^n§igeaa§d                 #;    ! nád/néd
+CondDefSg3:^+cCDefSg3^n§igeaa§                  #;    ! ná/né
+CondDefPl1:^+cCDefPl1^n§igeaa§nk                #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondDefPl2:^+cCDefPl2^n§igeaa§t§igeo§k          #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondDefPl3:^+cCDefPl3^n§igeaa§k                 #;    ! nák/nék
+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^t§igea§l§igea§k               #;    ! ta/te
+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^n§igeaa§l§igea§k                  #;    ! ná/né
!+Inf11:^+ccInf11^§igea§n§igeoue§m #;
!+Inf12:^+ccInf12^§igea§n§igeoue§d #;
!+Inf13:^+ccInf13^§igea§ni§AA§ #;
!+Inf21:^+ccInf21^§igea§n§igeu§nk #;
!+Inf22:^+ccInf22^§igea§n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
!+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§igea§ni§igeu§k #;
!+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
!+Inf:^+cInf^§igea§ni  #;
